Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.405

Parks and parkways account abolished—Funds transferred to general fund.

The state parks and parkways account created under section 43.79.330(15), chapter 8, Laws of 1965, is hereby abolished and all funds remaining therein at August 1, 1969, transferred to the state general fund.

[ 1969 c 99 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1969 c 99: See note following RCW 79A.05.070.